Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 1
BOARD OF DIRECTORS

7-128-101. Requirement for board of directors.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, each nonprofit corporation shall have a board of directors. The board of directors and the directors may be known by any other names designated in the bylaws.

Subject to any provision stated in the articles of incorporation, all corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the nonprofit corporation managed under the direction of, the board of directors or such other persons as the articles of incorporation provide shall have the authority and perform the duties of a board of directors. To the extent the articles of incorporation provide that other persons shall have the authority and perform the duties of the board of directors, the directors shall be relieved to that extent from such authority and duties.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 688, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2340, § 298, effective July 1, 2004.

7-128-102. Qualifications of directors.

A director shall be an individual. The bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors. A director need not be a resident of this state or a member of the nonprofit corporation unless the bylaws so prescribe.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 688, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1510, § 295, effective July 1; entire section amended, p. 342, § 1, effective August 4.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by House Bill 04-1398 and House Bill 04-1224 were harmonized.

7-128-103. Number of directors.

A board of directors shall consist of one or more directors, with the number stated in, or fixed in accordance with, the bylaws.

The bylaws may establish, or permit the voting members or the board of directors to establish, a range for the size of the board of directors by fixing a minimum and maximum number of directors. If a range is established, the number of directors may be fixed or changed from time to time within the range by the voting members or the board of directors.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 688, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2340, § 299, effective July 1, 2004.

7-128-104. Election, appointment, and designation of directors.

All directors except the initial directors shall be elected, appointed, or designated as provided in the bylaws. If no method of election, appointment, or designation is stated in the bylaws, the directors other than the initial directors shall be elected as follows:

If the nonprofit corporation has voting members, all directors except the initial directors shall be elected by the voting members at each annual meeting of the voting members; and

If the nonprofit corporation does not have voting members, all directors except the initial directors shall be elected by the board of directors.

The bylaws may authorize the election of all or a stated number or portion of directors, except the initial directors, by the members of one or more voting groups of voting members or by the directors of one or more authorized classes of directors. A class of voting members or directors entitled to elect one or more directors is a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.

The bylaws may authorize the appointment of one or more directors by such person or persons, or by the holder of such office or position, as the bylaws shall state.

For purposes of articles 121 to 137 of this title, designation occurs when the bylaws name an individual as a director or designate the holder of some office or position as a director.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 688, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 2340, § 300, effective July 1, 2004.

7-128-105. Terms of directors generally.

The bylaws may state the terms of directors. In the absence of any term stated in the bylaws, the term of each director shall be one year. Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, directors may be elected for successive terms.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the terms of the initial directors of a nonprofit corporation expire at the first meeting at which directors are elected or appointed.

A decrease in the number of directors or in the term of office does not shorten an incumbent director's term.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the term of a director filling a vacancy expires at the end of the unexpired term that such director is filling.

Despite the expiration of a director's term, a director continues to serve until the director's successor is elected, appointed, or designated and qualifies, or until there is a decrease in the number of directors.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 689, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 98:

(6) added, p. 623, § 28, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(6) amended, p. 983, § 81, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(6) amended, p. 1855, § 136, effective July 1; (6) amended, p. 1720, § 138, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2340, § 302, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(6) repealed, p. 1511, § 296, effective July 1.

7-128-106. Staggered terms for directors.

The bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into any number of groups. The terms of office of the several groups need not be uniform.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 689, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-128-107. Resignation of directors.

A director may resign at any time by giving written notice of resignation to the nonprofit corporation.

A resignation of a director is effective when the notice is received by the nonprofit corporation unless the notice states a later effective date.

Repealed.

If, at the beginning of a director's term on the board, the bylaws provide that a director may be deemed to have resigned for failing to attend a stated number of board meetings, or for failing to meet other stated obligations of directors, and if such failure to attend or meet obligations is confirmed by an affirmative vote of the board of directors, then such failure to attend or meet obligations shall be effective as a resignation at the time of such vote of the board.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 690, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(3) amended, p. 983, § 82, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1855, § 137, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1720, § 139, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(2) and (4) amended, p. 2340, § 302, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(3) repealed, p. 1511, § 297, effective July 1.

7-128-108. Removal of directors.

Directors elected by voting members or directors may be removed as follows:

The voting members may remove one or more directors elected by them with or without cause unless the bylaws provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

If a director is elected by a voting group, only that voting group may participate in the vote to remove that director.

Subject to section

7-127-208 (3)

, a director may be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove the director would be sufficient to elect the director at a meeting to elect directors.

A director elected by voting members may be removed by the voting members only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing that director, and the meeting notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

An entire board of directors may be removed under paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection (1).

A director elected by the board of directors may be removed with or without cause by the vote of a majority of the directors then in office or such greater number as is stated in the bylaws; except that a director elected by the board of directors to fill the vacancy of a director elected by the voting members may be removed without cause by the voting members, but not the board of directors.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 983, § 83, effective July 1, 2000.)

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws:

An appointed director may be removed without cause by the person appointing the director;

The person removing the director shall do so by giving written notice of the removal to the director and to the nonprofit corporation; and

A removal is effective when the notice is received by both the director to be removed and the nonprofit corporation unless the notice states a later effective date.

A designated director may be removed by an amendment to the bylaws deleting or changing the designation.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 690, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1)(g) amended and (4) added, p. 983, § 83, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 1855, § 138, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 1720, § 140, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(f) and (2)(c) amended, p. 2341, § 303, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(4) repealed, p. 1511, § 298, effective July 1.

7-128-109. Removal of directors by judicial proceeding.

A director may be removed by the district court for the county in this state in which the address of the nonprofit corporation's principal office is located or, if the nonprofit corporation has no principal office in this state, by the district court for the county in which the street address of its registered agent is located, or, if the nonprofit corporation has no registered agent, by the district court for the city and county of Denver, in a proceeding commenced either by the nonprofit corporation or by voting members holding at least ten percent of the votes entitled to be cast in the election of such director's successor, if the court finds that the director engaged in fraudulent or dishonest conduct or gross abuse of authority or discretion with respect to the nonprofit corporation, or a final judgment has been entered finding that the director has violated a duty set forth in part 4 of this article, and that removal is in the best interests of the nonprofit corporation.

The court that removes a director may bar the director from reelection for a period prescribed by the court.

If voting members commence a proceeding under subsection (1) of this section, they shall make the nonprofit corporation a party defendant.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 691, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(4) amended, p. 983, § 84, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 1855, § 139, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 1720, § 141, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2341, § 304, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(4) repealed, p. 1511, § 299, effective July 1.

7-128-110. Vacancy on board.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, if a vacancy occurs on a board of directors, including a vacancy resulting from an increase in the number of directors:

The voting members, if any, may fill the vacancy;

The board of directors may fill the vacancy; or

If the directors remaining in office constitute fewer than a quorum of the board of directors, they may fill the vacancy by the affirmative vote of a majority of all the directors remaining in office.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, if the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of voting members:

If one or more of the remaining directors were elected by the same voting group of voting members, only such directors are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by directors, and they may do so by the affirmative vote of a majority of such directors remaining in office; and

Only that voting group is entitled to vote to fill the vacancy if it is filled by the voting members.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, if the vacant office was held by a director elected by a voting group of directors, and if any persons in that voting group remain as directors, only such directors are entitled to vote to fill the vacancy.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, if a vacant office was held by an appointed director, only the person who appointed the director may fill the vacancy.

If a vacant office was held by a designated director, the vacancy shall be filled as provided in the bylaws. In the absence of an applicable bylaw provision, the vacancy may not be filled by the board.

A vacancy that will occur at a specific later date, by reason of a resignation effective at a later date under section 7-128-107 (2) or otherwise, may be filled before the vacancy occurs, but the new director may not take office until the vacancy occurs.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 691, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.

7-128-111. Compensation of directors.

Unless otherwise provided in the bylaws, the board of directors may authorize and fix the compensation of directors.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 692, § 3, effective July 1, 1998.